Illinois, session 104th, HB2776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5B-2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5B-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5B-2)7    Sec. 5B-2. Assessment; no local authorization to tax. 8    (a) For the privilege of engaging in the occupation of 9long-term care provider, beginning July 1, 2011 through June 1030, 2022, or upon federal approval by the Centers for Medicare 11and Medicaid Services of the long-term care provider 12assessment described in subsection (a-1), whichever is later, 13an assessment is imposed upon each long-term care provider in 14an amount equal to $6.07 times the number of occupied bed days 15due and payable each month. Notwithstanding any provision of 16any other Act to the contrary, this assessment shall be 17construed as a tax, but shall not be billed or passed on to any 18resident of a nursing home operated by the nursing home 19provider.20    (a-1) For the privilege of engaging in the occupation of 21long-term care provider for each occupied non-Medicare bed 22day, beginning July 1, 2022, an assessment is imposed upon 23each long-term care provider in an amount varying with the   HB2776- 2 -LRB104 09538 KTG 19601 b1number of paid Medicaid resident days per annum in the 2facility with the following schedule of occupied bed tax 3amounts. This assessment is due and payable each month. The 4tax shall follow the schedule below and be rebased by the 5Department on an annual basis. The Department shall publish 6each facility's rebased tax rate according to the schedule in 7this Section 30 days prior to the beginning of the 6-month 8period beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter 30 days prior to 9the beginning of each calendar year which shall incorporate 10the number of paid Medicaid days used to determine each 11facility's rebased tax rate.12        (1) 0-5,000 paid Medicaid resident days per annum, 13    $10.67.14        (2) 5,001-15,000 paid Medicaid resident days per 15    annum, $19.20.16        (3) 15,001-35,000 paid Medicaid resident days per 17    annum, $22.40.18        (4) 35,001-55,000 paid Medicaid resident days per 19    annum, $19.20.20        (5) 55,001-65,000 paid Medicaid resident days per 21    annum, $13.86.22        (6) 65,001+ paid Medicaid resident days per annum, 23    $10.67.24        (7) Any non-profit nursing facilities without 25    Medicaid-certified beds or any nursing facility owned and 26    operated by a county government, $7 per occupied bed day.   HB2776- 3 -LRB104 09538 KTG 19601 b1    The changes made by Public Act 102-1118 this amendatory 2    Act of the 102nd General Assembly to this paragraph (7) 3    shall be implemented only upon federal approval. 4    Notwithstanding any provision of any other Act to the 5contrary, this assessment shall be construed as a tax but 6shall not be billed or passed on to any resident of a nursing 7home operated by the nursing home provider.8    For each new calendar year and for the 6-month period 9beginning July 1, 2022, a facility's paid Medicaid resident 10days per annum shall be determined using the Department's 11Medicaid Management Information System to include Medicaid 12resident days for the year ending 9 months earlier.13    (b) Nothing in this amendatory Act of 1992 shall be 14construed to authorize any home rule unit or other unit of 15local government to license for revenue or impose a tax or 16assessment upon long-term care providers or the occupation of 17long-term care provider, or a tax or assessment measured by 18the income or earnings or occupied bed days of a long-term care 19provider.20    (c) The assessment imposed by this Section shall not be 21due and payable, however, until after the Department notifies 22the long-term care providers, in writing, that the payment 23methodologies to long-term care providers required under 24Section 5-5.2 of this Code have been approved by the Centers 25for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of 26Health and Human Services and that the waivers under 42 CFR   HB2776- 4 -LRB104 09538 KTG 19601 b1433.68 for the assessment imposed by this Section, if 2necessary, have been granted by the Centers for Medicare and 3Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 4Services. 5    (d) Any increase in any assessment authorized under this 6Section must:7        (1) comply with all federal regulations for provider 8    assessments;9        (2) require that all revenues from an increase in the 10    assessed rates are applied to nursing facility rates for 11    staffing incentives as described in paragraphs (6) and 12    (6.5) of subsection (d) of Section 5-5.2 or to improve the 13    quality of care as described in paragraph (1) of 14    subsection (l) of Section 5-5.2;15        (3) not increase the assessed rate of $7 per occupied 16    bed day for non-profit nursing facilities without 17    Medicaid-certified beds or any nursing facility owned and 18    operated by a county government;19        (4) maintain the 2.1 to 1 ratio between the highest 20    tax rate and lowest tax rate; and21        (5) not increase any tax rate proportionally more than 22    any other tax rate.23(Source: P.A. 102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.